Montana, session 2025, SB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 69-3-805, MCA, is amended to read:
"69-3-805. Registration of telecommunications providers -- rulemaking. (1) Before any person or
entity provides telecommunications service within the state of Montana, it shall file with the commission a notice
including with the commission:.
(a) the name, address, and telephone number of the provider;
(b) the name, address, and telephone number of the person responsible for regulatory contacts
and customer dispute resolution on behalf of the provider;
(c) a description of the provider's existing operations and general service and operating areas in
any other jurisdictions;
(d) a list of the provider's parent, subsidiary, and affiliated companies, together with principal
addresses and telephone numbers of each;
(e) initial tariffs or price lists for regulated telecommunications services, including a narrative
description of the regulated telecommunications to be offered and the geographic area and markets to be
served;
(f) a general description of the facilities and equipment that will be used to provide services,
including whether the service will be offered on a facilities basis, a resale basis, or a combination of both of
them;
(g) a statement of whether the provider intends to draw from the federal or state universal service
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 51
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 51
fund or other explicit support funds, including a statement of whether the provider intends to seek the
commission's designation as an eligible telecommunications carrier;
(h) disclosure of any formal actions against it by any court or state or federal regulatory agency
that resulted in any type of penalty or sanction within the 5 years prior to the date of filing the notice;
(i) if the provider is other than a corporation, a description of the form of ownership, the names
and addresses of all principal owners and managers, the provider's agent for service of process in Montana,
and the date of creation of the business entity; and
(j) other information from regulated telecommunications carriers as the commission may require to
accomplish the purposes of this chapter.
(2) The commission may waive any of the requirements set forth in subsection (1).
(3)(2) The provider shall file with the commission a report of any judgment, penalty, or sanction
entered in any other jurisdiction that could adversely affect the provider's ability to provide communications
services in Montana.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 51
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 51, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 51
INTRODUCED BY D. ZOLNIKOV
BY REQUEST OF THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
AN ACT REVISING TELECOMMUNICATIONS PROVIDER REGISTRATION LAWS; PROVIDING
RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AMENDING SECTION 69-3-805, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE
EFFECTIVE DATE.”